Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1217
Agency, defined.

Agency shall mean (1) any department, agency, or instrumentality of (a) the State of Nebraska, (b) any political subdivision of the State of Nebraska, (c) any combination of states which includes the State of Nebraska, (d) any combination of political subdivisions, either of the State of Nebraska alone or of the State of Nebraska and any other state or states acting in combination, and (2) any person who has the authority to acquire property by eminent domain under state law.

Laws 1989, LB 254, § 4.